Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2243
Probation officers; performance metrics.

The office shall establish performance metrics for probation officers. Such metrics should measure efficacy in providing rehabilitative and reentry services to probationers. Such metrics should:

(1) Reflect a balanced approach that considers both compliance and enforcement measures as well as outcomes related to rehabilitation, reintegration, and public safety;

(2) Include indicators of progress for probationers, such as successful completion of treatment programs, educational attainment, employment status, and compliance with conditions of supervision;

(3) Emphasize the importance of providing supportive services, fostering positive relationships with probationers, and promoting successful community reentry; and

(4) Be aligned with best practices, stakeholder input, and the evolving goals and priorities of the criminal justice system.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 24.